New Jersey, session 221, A2487.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Notwithstanding any contrary provision of P.L.1954, c.84 (C.43:15A-1 et seq.), and except as may be otherwise provided in P.L.1972, c.167 (C.43:15A-135 et seq.), a member of the retirement system who is serving as an elected official on the effective date of this act, P.L.    , c.    (C.    )(pending before the Legislature as this bill), shall be eligible to retire while holding public office to which the member was elected and receiving the full salary for that office if the retirement allowance is not based solely on the members service in the public office to which the member was elected, and no contributions shall be required of the member covering that service. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.